California, session 20252026, AB2419.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 287 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:287. (a) The County of Los Angeles (county) shall implement a body-worn camera program for the County of Los Angeles Probation Department (probation department). This program shall apply to all probation officers and staff interacting with probation clients in the field and in facilities.(b) The county, the probation department, and affected employee organizations shall, no later than June 1, 2027, develop a body-worn camera policy that mirrors best practices of law enforcement agencies in the City and County of Los Angeles.(c) The county shall, no later than June 1, 2027, in conjunction with the probation department and affected employee organizations, develop a plan for implementing a body-worn camera program for the probation department. The program shall be implemented beginning on January 1, 2028. (d) The policy developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) Which officers should be assigned to wear a body camera and the circumstances under which the cameras should be worn.(2) The minimum specifications for body-worn cameras.(3) The best locations on an officer’s body where the camera shall be worn.(4) Best practices for officers to notify members of the public that they are being recorded.(5) Who should retain body camera data and how they should do it.(6) Best practices for officer review of recorded body-worn camera data and body-worn camera data’s use for training. SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique challenges and myriad of issues relative to the County of Los Angeles Probation Department based on the size and population overseen by the probation department.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.